en: Hungarian fruit spirit
hu: Magyar gyümölcspárlatok

en: Italian fruit spirit
hu: Olasz gyümölcspárlatok

en: Romanian fruit spirit
hu: Romániai gyümölcspárlatok, Román gyümölcspárlatok

en: Slovenian fruit spirit
hu: Szlovén gyümölcspárlatok

en: Pálinka
be: Палінка
bg: Палинка
ca: Aiguardent de fruita
cv: Палинка
de: Pálinka
fi: Pálinka
fr: Pálinka
hr: Pálinka
hu: Pálinka
it: Pálinka
lt: Palinka
nl: Palinka
pl: Palinca, Pálinka
pt: Palinca
ro: Palincă
ru: Палинка
sv: Pálinka
uk: Палінка
zh: 帕林卡

en: Hungarian Pálinka
hu: Magyar pálinka

en: Austrian Pálinka
hu: Osztrák pálinka, Ausztriai pálinka

hu: Újfehértói meggypálinka
fr: Pálinka de griotte d'Újfehértó

hu: Szatmári szilvapálinka
fr: Pálinka de prune de Szatmár

hu: Békési szilvapálinka
fr: Pálinka de prune de Békés

hu: Kecskeméti barackpálinka
fr: Pálinka d'abricot de Kecskemét

hu: Szabolcsi almapálinka
fr: Pálinka de pomme de Szabolcs

en: Cherry Brandy
fr: Brandy aux cerises

en: Portuguese fruit spirit
hu: Portugál gyümölcspárlatok

en: Medronho
pt: Medronho, Aquardente de Medronhos

en: Whisky, whiskey
bg: Уиски
de: Whisky, Whiskey
es: Whiskies, Whiskys, Whisky, Whiskey, Whiskeys, Güisquis, wiski
fi: viski
fr: Whiskys, whiskies, whiskey, whiskeys
hr: Viski
hu: Whisky, Viszki
it: Whisky, whiskey
ja: ウイスキー, ウィスキー
lt: Viskis
nl: Whiskey, Whisky
pl: Whisky, Whiskey
pt: Uísques, whisky
ro: Whisky, whiskey

en: Blended whisky
de: Blended Whisky
fr: Blended whisky, blend
hr: Blendirani viski
hu: Kevert whisky
nl: Blended whiskies

en: Single malt whisky
fr: Whisky single malt

en: Rye whisky
de: Roggenwhiskey, Rye Whiskey, Rye Whisky
fi: Ruisviski
fr: whisky de seigle
hr: Raženi viski
nl: Rye whisky

en: Corn whiskey
de: Mais whiskey
hr: Kukuruzni viski
nl: Maïswhiskey